Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-2930
Becoming a member.

A person becomes a member:

(1) As provided in the articles of organization and bylaws;

(2) As the result of merger or consolidation under section 21-29,122; or

(3) With the consent of all the members.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 30;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 6.